DTC P0202 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0102f1805700
DTC P0202 |
Fuel injector No.2 operation identified |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The PCM monitors each cylinder fuel injector control signal current while the engine is running. If the PCM detects control signal current less than 18.5 A, the PCM determines that the fuel injector No.2 operation is not verified.
Diagnostic support note
• The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in the first drive cycle.
• FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
• The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Connector or terminal malfunction
• Fuel injector No.2 malfunction
• Short to ground in wiring between fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
• Open circuit in wiring between fuel injector No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 21
• Open circuit in wiring between fuel injector No.2 terminal A and PCM terminal 4
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related Service Bulletins and/or on-line repair information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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IDENTIFY TRIGGER DTC FOR FREEZE FRAME DATA
• Is DTC P0202 on FREEZE FRAME DATA?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the troubleshooting procedures for the DTC in the FREEZE FRAME DATA.
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5
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INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR NO.2 CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to Step 10.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR FOR SHORT TO GROUND
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Disconnect fuel injector No.2 connector.
• Inspect for continuity between the following fuel injector No.2 terminals and body ground.
• Is there continuity?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for a short to ground, then go to Step 10.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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INSPECT FUEL INJECTOR
• Inspect the fuel injector No.2.
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Replace fuel injector No.2, then go to Step 10.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the suspected terminal, then go to Step 10.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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9
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INSPECT FOR OPEN CIRCUIT BETWEEN FUEL INJECTOR AND PCM
• Turn the engine switch off.
• PCM and fuel injector No.2 connector disconnected.
• Inspect for continuity between fuel injector No.2 and PCM at following harness-side connector.
• Is there continuity?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for an open circuit, then go to the next step.
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10
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VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0202 COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear the DTC using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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11
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC troubleshooting.
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No
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Troubleshooting completed.
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